Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.070

Appropriations.

Appropriations shall be deemed maximum authorizations to incur expenditures but the governor shall exercise all due supervision and control to ensure that expenditure rates are such that program objectives are realized within these maximums.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.88.070. Prior: 1959 c 328 s 7.]